Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201585-2003
Community college gap assistance program; created; purpose; eligibility.

(1) The community college gap assistance program is created. The program shall be under the direction of the committee and shall be administered by the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education. The purpose of the community college gap assistance program is to provide funding to community colleges to award community college gap assistance to students in eligible programs.

(2) To be eligible for community college gap assistance under the community college gap assistance program, an applicant:

(a) Shall have a family income which is at or below two hundred fifty percent of Office of Management and Budget income poverty guidelines; and

(b) Shall be a resident of Nebraska as provided in section 85-502.

(3) Eligibility for such tuition assistance shall not be construed to guarantee enrollment in any eligible program.

Laws 2015, LB519, § 29.
August 30, 2015